District of Columbia statutes.
50-506

Listing of odometer readings.

The Department of Public Works shall list the odometer readings at the time of registration or transfer of registration on the title of all motor vehicles registered in the District.

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-162, § 8, 32 DCR 160
1981 Ed., § 40-1306.
Registration of motor vehicles, issuance and expiration of registration documents, see § 50-1501.02.